Hawaii statutes.
§4-1 Districts, generally. For
election, taxation, city, county, and all other purposes, the State shall be
divided into the following districts; provided that the establishment of
election districts shall be exclusively governed by article IV of the constitution
of the State of Hawaii and chapter 25:

(1) The island and county of Hawaii shall be divided
into nine districts as follows:

(A) Puna, to be styled the Puna district;

(B) From the Hakalau stream to the boundary
of South Hilo and Puna, to be styled the South Hilo district;

(C) From the boundary of Hamakua and North
Hilo to the Hakalau stream, to be styled the North Hilo district;

(D) Hamakua, to be styled the Hamakua
district;

(E) North Kohala, to be styled the North
Kohala district;

(F) South Kohala, to be styled the South
Kohala district;

(G) North Kona, to be styled the North Kona
district;

(H) South Kona, to be styled the South Kona
district; and

(I) Kau, to be styled the Kau district.

(2) The islands of Maui, Molokai, Lanai, and
Kahoolawe and the counties of Maui and Kalawao shall be divided into seven
districts as follows:

(A) Kahikinui, Kaupo, Kipahulu, Hana, and
Koolau, to be styled the Hana district;

(B) Hamakualoa, Hamakuapoko, portion of Kula,
and Honuaula, the western boundary being a line starting from the sea at
Kapukaulua on the boundary between the ahupuaas of Haliimaile and Wailuku,
thence running inland following the boundary to the mauka side of the Lowrie
ditch, thence following the mauka side of the ditch and its projected extension
to the Waiakoa gulch which is the boundary between the ahupuaas of Pulehunui
and Waiakoa, thence down along the boundary to the mauka boundary of the
Waiakoa Homesteads (makai section), thence along the boundary to the ahupuaa of
Kaonoulu, thence across the ahupuaa of Kaonoulu to the mauka boundary of the
Waiohuli-Keokea Beach Homesteads, thence along the boundary to the mauka
boundary of the Kamaole Homesteads, thence along the boundary and the extension
thereof to the north boundary of the ahupuaa of Paeahu, thence along the
boundary to the sea, and including the island of Kahoolawe, to be styled the
Makawao district;

(C) All that portion of central Maui lying
east of a line along the boundary of the ahupuaas of Kahakuloa and Honokohau to
the peak of Eke crater, thence along the ridge of mountains and down the bottom
of Manawainui gulch to the sea, and west of the boundary of Makawao district,
to be styled Wailuku district;

(D) All that portion of Maui lying west of
Wailuku district, to be styled the Lahaina district;

(E) The island of Molokai, except that
portion of the island known as Kalaupapa, Kalawao, and Waikolu and commonly
known or designated as the Settlement for Hansen's disease sufferers, to be
styled the Molokai district;

(F) All that portion of the island of Molokai
known as Kalaupapa, Kalawao, and Waikolu forming the county of Kalawao, to be
styled the Kalawao district; and

(G) The island of Lanai, to be styled the
Lanai district.

(3) For judicial purposes, the island of Oahu shall
be divided into seven districts as follows:

(A) From Makapuu Head in Maunalua to Moanalua
inclusive, and the islands not included in any other district, to be styled the
Honolulu district;

(B) Ewa, excluding Waikakalaua, Waipio Acres,
and Mililani Town, to be styled the Ewa district;

(C) Waianae excluding Waianae Uka, to be
styled the Waianae district;

(D) From Kaena point to and including Waialee
Stream excluding Wahiawa, hereinafter described, to be styled the Waialua district;

(E) From Waialee Stream to Lae o ka Oio, to
be styled the Koolauloa district;

(F) From Lae o ka Oio to Makapuu Head in
Waimanalo, to be styled the Koolaupoko district; and

(G) Wahiawa and Waianae Uka, including
Waikakalaua, Waipio Acres, and Mililani Town, lying between Ewa and Waialua
districts and more particularly described in the following manner: Beginning
at Puu Kaaumakua in the Koolau range and running to and along the south
boundary of Waianae Uka (which is also the south boundary of Schofield Barracks
Military Reservation) to Puu Hapapa in the Waianae range; thence continuing
along Schofield Barracks Military Reservation northerly along the Waianae range
to Puu Kaala, easterly along Mokuleia down ridge to Puu Pane, continuing to
Maili Trig. station, and down ridge to Haleauau stream and down Haleauau stream
to Kaukonahua gulch, and easterly along the gulch to the west boundary of the
ahupuaa of Wahiawa; thence leaving Schofield Barracks Military Reservation and
following up and along the west and north boundaries of the ahupuaa of Wahiawa
to the Koolau range; thence along the Koolau range to the beginning; to be
styled the Wahiawa district.

(4) For all purposes except for judicial, the island
of Oahu shall be divided into seven districts as follows:

(A) From Makapuu Head in Maunalua to Moanalua
inclusive, and the islands not included in any other district, to be styled the
Honolulu district;

(B) Ewa, to be styled the Ewa district;

(C) Waianae excluding Waianae Uka, to be
styled the Waianae district;

(D) From Kaena point to and including the
ahupuaa of Waimea excluding Wahiawa, hereinafter described, to be styled the
Waialua district;

(E) From Waimea to Lae o ka Oio, to be styled
the Koolauloa district;

(F) From Lae o ka Oio to Makapuu Head in
Waimanalo, to be styled the Koolaupoko district; and

(G) Wahiawa and Waianae Uka, lying between
Ewa and Waialua districts and more particularly described in the following
manner: Beginning at Puu Kaaumakua in the Koolau range and running to and
along the south boundary of Waianae Uka (which is also the south boundary of
Schofield Barracks Military Reservation) to Puu Hapapa in the Waianae range;
thence continuing along Schofield Barracks Military Reservation northerly along
the Waianae range to Puu Kaala, easterly along Mokuleia down ridge to Puu Pane,
continuing to Maili Trig. station, and down ridge to Haleauau stream and down
Haleauau stream to Kaukonahua gulch, and easterly along the gulch to the west
boundary of the ahupuaa of Wahiawa; thence leaving Schofield Barracks Military
Reservation and following up and along the west and north boundaries of the
ahupuaa of Wahiawa to the Koolau range; thence along the Koolau range to the
beginning; to be styled the Wahiawa district.

(5) The islands of Kauai, Niihau, Kaula, and county
of Kauai, shall be divided into five districts as follows:

(A) From Puanaaiea point to the ili of
Eleele, including the islands of Niihau and Kaula, to be styled the Waimea
district;

(B) From and including the ili of Eleele to
and including Mahaulepu, to be styled the Koloa district;

(C) From and including Kipu to the northerly
bank of the north fork and the main Wailua river, to be styled the Lihue
district;

(D) From the northerly bank of the north fork
and the main Wailua river to Kealaakaiole, to be styled the Kawaihau district;
and

(E) From and including Kealaakaiole to
Puanaaiea point to be styled the Hanalei district. [CC 1859, §498; am L 1878, c
24; am L 1880, c 11; am L 1886, c 44; am L 1887, c 37; am imp L 1890, cc 23,
58; am imp L 1893-4, c 86; superseded by L 1909, c 84, §1; am L 1913, c 34, §1
and c 112, §1; am L 1915, c 52, §1; am L 1921, c 24, §1; RL 1925, §144; am L
1925, c 13, §1; am L 1932 2d, c 68, §§1, 2; RL 1935, §7620; am L 1939, c 35, §1;
RL 1945, §151; RL 1955, pt of §10-1; am L 1955, c 191, §1(a); am L 1959, c 6,
pt of §1; HRS §4-1; am L 1988, c 245, §2; am L 1989, c 36, §2; am L 1991, c 15,
§1; am L 1996, c 179, §1; am L 2012, c 133, §2]

Cross References

Land districts, see §171-9.

Reapportionment, see chapter 25.

School board districts, see §13-1.

Statistical boundaries, see §26-18.

Tax districts, see §231-2.

Case Notes

State tax maps could not be used to establish venue in DUI
prosecution where maps did not represent legislatively authorized schematics of
official district boundaries for non-taxation purposes. 80 H. 291, 909 P.2d
1106.

Honolulu and Ewa boundary described in paragraph (3) not
inherently ambiguous; can be proved through testimony of reputation in the community
and is capable of accurate and ready determination by sources whose accuracy
cannot reasonably be questioned. 80 H. 297, 909 P.2d 1112.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next